Hawaii statutes.
INFORMATION
CHARGING

[§806-81] Definitions. In this part,
unless a different meaning is plainly required:

"Legal prosecuting officer" means the
attorney general or a prosecuting attorney, a deputy attorney general or a
deputy prosecuting attorney, or a person designated and authorized by the
attorney general or prosecuting attorney to act as a deputy attorney general or
deputy prosecuting attorney, respectively. [L 2004, c 62, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next